Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.0261

Community engagement boards—Effect of diversion from truancy petitions—Evaluation by Washington state institute for public policy—Reports.

(1) By requiring an initial stay of truancy petitions for diversion to community engagement boards, the legislature intends to achieve the following outcomes:

(a) Increased access to community engagement boards and other truancy early intervention programs for parents and children throughout the state;

(b) Increased quantity and quality of truancy intervention and prevention efforts in the community;

(c) A reduction in the number of truancy petitions that result in further proceedings by juvenile courts, other than dismissal of the petition, after the initial stay and diversion to a community engagement board;

(d) A reduction in the number of truancy petitions that result in a civil contempt proceeding or detention order; and

(e) Increased school attendance.

(2) No later than January 1, 2021, the Washington state institute for public policy is directed to evaluate the effectiveness of chapter 205, Laws of 2016. An initial report scoping of the methodology to be used to review chapter 205, Laws of 2016 shall be submitted to the fiscal committees of the legislature by January 1, 2018. The initial report must identify any data gaps that could hinder the ability of the institute to conduct its review.

[ 2021 c 119 s 12; 2016 c 205 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 119 ss 7-15: See note following RCW 28A.225.030.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 119: See note following RCW 28A.225.007.